District of Columbia statutes.
47-819

Compilation and publication of comparisons.

The Mayor shall, by June 30th of each year, compile and publish information regarding the relative amount of tax for all major taxes in the District compared with those in surrounding jurisdictions in the Washington metropolitan area and with those in other cities. The information shall include the rate or rates of the property tax levied on residential and nonresidential property, and the effect of major taxes levied on families of different income levels and on businesses.

History

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1053, Pub. L. 93-407, title IV, § 416
June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-70, title III, § 305, 23 DCR 540
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-819.
1973 Ed., § 47-636.